Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1394HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 898 Section 1. Section 299.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Who is a military applicant undergoing 3 military entrance processing. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Who is engaged in military service. 5